Utah statutes.
13-32a-111.   Fees to fund training and central database.

(1) (a) (i)  On and after January 1, 2005, each pawnshop or secondhand merchandise dealer in operation shall annually pay $250 to the division, to be deposited in the account.

(ii)  On and after January 1, 2013, each pawnshop or secondhand merchandise dealer in operation shall annually pay $300 to the division, to be deposited in the account.

(b)  For the period of July 1, 2009 through December 31, 2009, each coin dealer in operation shall pay a fee of $250 to the division to be deposited in the account.

(c) (i)  On and after January 1, 2010, each coin dealer in operation shall annually on January 1 pay $250 to the division to be deposited in the account.

(ii)  On and after January 1, 2013, each coin dealer in operation shall annually on January 1 pay $300 to the division to be deposited in the account.

(2) (a)  On and after January 1, 2005, each law enforcement agency that participates in the use of the database shall annually pay to the division a fee of $2 per sworn law enforcement officer who is employed by the agency as of January 1 of that year.  The fee shall be deposited in the account.

(b)  On and after January 1, 2013, each law enforcement agency that participates in the use of the database shall annually pay to the division a fee of $3 per sworn law enforcement officer who is employed by the agency as of January 1 of that year.  The fee shall be deposited in the account.

(3)  The fees under Subsections (1) and (2) shall be paid to the account annually on or before January 30.

(4) (a) (i)  If a law enforcement agency outside Utah requests access to the central database, the requesting agency shall pay a yearly fee of $750 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006, which shall be deposited in the account.

(ii)  If a law enforcement agency outside Utah requests access to the central database, the requesting agency shall pay a yearly fee of $900 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2013, which shall be deposited in the account.

(b)  The board may establish the fee amount for fiscal years beginning on and after July 1, 2007 under Section 63J-1-504.

